Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-829.49
Local government, school district, or educational service unit appropriations.

Each local government, school district, or educational service unit shall have the power to make appropriations in the manner provided by law for making appropriations for the ordinary expenses of such local government, school district, or educational service unit for the payment of expenses of its city, village, county, school district, educational service unit, or interjurisdictional emergency management organization and in furthering the purposes of the Emergency Management Act.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 10(1), p. 1081;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.22;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 14;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 29;

Laws 2015, LB283, § 4.